Maryland, session 2025, SB0307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–2A–01.
(a) The Anne Arundel County Board of Education consists of:
(1) Seven nonpartisan elected members; and
(2) One student member.
3–2A–07.
(a) The president of the county board is entitled to receive $17,000 annually as
compensation, the vice president is entitled to receive $16,000 annually as compensation,
and, except for the student member, the other board members are entitled to receive
$15,000 each annually as compensation.
– 1 –

Ch. 8 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) A student member who completes a full term on the county board shall be
granted a scholarship of [$8,000] $15,000 to be applied toward the student’s higher
education costs.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 2 –